test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngumhTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюнинзь, ӈумгюнинзь]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдинзь, ӈумгюдинзь]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдинзь, ӈумгюдинзь]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюнаць, ӈумгюнаць]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдаць, ӈумгюдаць]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдонзь, ӈумгюдонзь]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувон
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувод
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувода
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувониʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувонаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуводаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуводоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈувонась
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводась
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводась
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈувонинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈувонаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуводонзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Tra: ӈумӈэ
     ӈумʼ+N+Car: ӈумзиˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Equ: ӈумдремʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Equ+Lat: ӈумдревʼ
